North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 11B. Electronic Access to State Services.

§ 66-58.20.
Development and implementation of Web portals; public agency links.

The Department of Information Technology (DIT) shall develop the architecture, requirements, and standards for the development, implementation and operation of one or more centralized Web portals that will allow persons to access State government services on a 24-hour basis. DIT shall submit its plan for the implementation of the Web portals to the State Chief Information Officer for review and approval. When the plan is approved by the State Chief Information Officer, DIT shall move forward with development and implementation of the statewide Web Portal system.

Each State agency as defined in G.S. 143B-1320(a) shall functionally link its Internet or electronic services to a centralized Web portal system established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

2000-67, s. 7.9; 2004-129, s. 28; 2015-241, s. 7A.4(g).

Cross References.

As to implementation and operation of a statewide electronic portal, and the associated annual reporting requirements for the State Chief Information Officer, see G.S. 147-33.87A and the notes thereunder.